Arkansas, session 2025, HB1888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 11, Chapter 10, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
11-10-113. Access to employment records for individuals.
(a) Upon written request by an individual whose employment records are
maintained by the Division of Workforce Services under this chapter, the
division shall make available, without charge, the individual's wage and
employment record to the individual or his or her representative.
(b)(1) At the request of an individual under subsection (a) of this
section, the division shall provide the electronic transmission of the
individual's wage and employment records, directly or through a qualified
third-party vendor, for the purposes set forth in the Fair Credit Reporting
Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(2)(A) If the division uses a third-party vendor, the division
shall seek a qualified third-party vendor who conforms with the United States
Department of Labor rules to provide the technology without charge to the
division.
*CRH220*
03/20/2025 4:38:17 PM CRH220

HB1888
(B) Any revenue share from the qualified third-party
vendor to the division shall support eligible workforce programs.
(c) The division may promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. IMPLEMENTATION DATE.
The Division of Workforce Services shall complete the implementation of
this act sufficiently in advance to provide the electronic transmission of
employment records under § 11-10-113 to requesting individuals no later than
December 31, 2025.



























03/20/2025 4:38:17 PM CRH220